Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.111

Patrol officer vehicle accidents.

To ensure transparency, integrity, and credibility during Washington state patrol vehicle accident investigations, the agency will continue to review and reform the agency policies and procedures regarding Washington state patrol officers that are involved in vehicle accidents. The agency shall develop agency policies and include as part of the terms of their collective bargaining agreements a progressive corrective process addressing Washington state patrol officer vehicle accidents that may include retraining in vehicle handling, wage or benefit reductions, and termination of employment. The agency shall develop a process for tracking accidents and an accident review process. Annually, a collision data report must be produced designating each accident during the year as minor or severe and any resulting disciplinary actions and be available for review by the legislature. The agency shall implement communication procedures for the victims involved in the accidents from the time the accident occurs until the investigative process has been concluded. The policies must also provide for outside supervision of accident investigations by a qualified independent agency under certain circumstances.

Before the legislative committee assembly in September 2005, the Washington state patrol shall have an outside entity that has a reputation for and has proven experience in law enforcement management and reviewing law enforcement and criminal justice policies and procedures review the agency's proposed law enforcement vehicle accident policies and procedures where a law enforcement officer is involved. The agency will present the proposed policies and procedures to the legislature and finalize the policies and procedures based on input from the legislature. The Washington state patrol shall report to the house and senate transportation committees by November 30, 2005, on the updated policies, processes, and procedures. Once the policies and procedures are completed, other law enforcement agencies may adopt the policies and procedures for their agencies.

[ 2005 c 27 s 2.]

NOTES:

Intent—2005 c 27: "It is the intent of the legislature that accidents involving Washington state patrol officers follow a process that provides a high degree of integrity and credibility both within the investigation of the accident and the perception of the investigation from persons outside the investigation. It is the intent of the legislature to have a communication process in place for the Washington state patrol to communicate accident information to the persons and their families who are involved in the vehicle accidents. It is the intent of the legislature to have early detections in place to reduce future vehicle accidents." [ 2005 c 27 s 1.]

Short title—2005 c 27: "This act may be known and cited as the "Brock Loshbaugh Act."" [ 2005 c 27 s 3.]

Effective date—2005 c 27: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [April 13, 2005]." [ 2005 c 27 s 4.]